Illinois, session 104th, SB2639.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $1,500,000,000, or so much of that 5sum as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Metropolitan Mobility Authority Additional 7Operating Funding Fund. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 9Effective July 1, 2025.